Maryland, session 2026, SB0380.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
14–321.
(A) (1) BEGINNING OCTOBER 1, 2028, THE BOARD MAY ISSUE A LICENSE
TO PRACTICE MEDICINE TO A PHYSICIAN LICENSED IN A COUNTRY OTHER THAN THE
UNITED STATES, ITS TERRITORIES OR POSSESSIONS, PUERTO RICO, OR CANADA
WHO MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE TERM OF A LICENSE ISSUED BY THE BOARD UNDER THIS
SECTION MAY NOT EXCEED 3 YEARS.
(3) A LICENSE ISSUED BY THE BOARD UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT
BE RENEWED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0380*

SENATE BILL 380
(B) AN APPLICANT SHALL SUBMIT EVIDENCE ACCEPTABLE TO THE BOARD
THAT THE APPLICANT:
(1) HAS RECEIVED A DEGREE OF DOCTOR OF MEDICINE OR ITS
EQUIVALENT FROM A LEGALLY CHARTERED MEDICAL SCHOOL OUTSIDE THE
UNITED STATES, ITS TERRITORIES OR POSSESSIONS, PUERTO RICO, OR CANADA
THAT IS RECOGNIZED BY THE WORLD HEALTH ORGANIZATION;
(2) HAS COMPLETED AT LEAST 2 YEARS OF POSTGRADUATE
TRAINING IN THE COUNTRY IN WHICH THE APPLICANT IS LICENSED THAT IS
EQUIVALENT TO A POSTGRADUATE RESIDENCY PROGRAM ACCREDITED BY THE
ACCREDITATION COUNCIL FOR GRADUATE MEDICAL EDUCATION;
(3) HAS BEEN LICENSED OR OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE
MEDICINE IN A COUNTRY OTHER THAN THE UNITED STATES, ITS TERRITORIES OR
POSSESSIONS, PUERTO RICO, OR CANADA, AND HAS PRACTICED MEDICINE FOR AT
LEAST 5 OF THE 7 YEARS IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE DATE OF APPLICATION;
(4) IS IN GOOD STANDING WITH THE MEDICAL LICENSING OR
REGULATORY AUTHORITY IN THE COUNTRY OTHER THAN THE UNITED STATES, ITS
TERRITORIES OR POSSESSIONS, PUERTO RICO, OR CANADA WITH WHICH THE
BOARD, THE FEDERATION OF STATE MEDICAL BOARDS, OR ANOTHER NATIONALLY
RECOGNIZED MEDICAL STANDARDS OVERSIGHT ENTITY IS ABLE TO VERIFY THE
PHYSICIAN’S DISCIPLINE AND CRIMINAL BACKGROUND HISTORY;
(5) HAS NO PENDING DISCIPLINARY MATTERS BEFORE ANY
LICENSING OR REGULATORY BODY;
(6) HAS A VALID CERTIFICATE ISSUED BY THE EDUCATIONAL
COMMISSION FOR FOREIGN MEDICAL GRADUATES;
(7) HAS ACHIEVED A PASSING SCORE ON STEP 1, STEP 2 (CLINICAL
KNOWLEDGE), AND STEP 3 OF THE UNITED STATES MEDICAL LICENSING
EXAMINATION;
(8) IS DOMICILED IN THE STATE;
(9) DEMONSTRATES ORAL AND WRITTEN COMPETENCY IN THE
ENGLISH LANGUAGE;
(10) IS OF GOOD MORAL CHARACTER;

SENATE BILL 380 3
(11) MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER §§ 14–309 AND 14–313 OF
THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(12) HAS SATISFIED ANY OTHER CRITERIA ESTABLISHED BY THE
BOARD FOR ISSUANCE OF A LICENSE UNDER THIS SECTION.
(C) THE BOARD MAY DETERMINE AN APPLICANT INELIGIBLE FOR
LICENSURE IF THE APPLICANT HAD:
(1) A PREVIOUS DISCIPLINARY ACTION; OR
(2) DISCIPLINE OR COMPETENCY ISSUES DURING THE APPLICANT’S
POSTGRADUATE TRAINING.
(D) THE BOARD MAY REVOKE A LICENSE ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION IF:
(1) THE LICENSEE HAS PRACTICED OUTSIDE THE SCOPE OF THE
LICENSE;
(2) THE LICENSEE’S EMPLOYMENT IS TERMINATED;
(3) THE LICENSEE HAS BEEN THE SUBJECT OF A DISCIPLINARY
ACTION; OR
(4) THE LICENSEE IS NO LONGER ELIGIBLE FOR THE LICENSE.
(E) THE BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS:
(1) TO ESTABLISH MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS AND APPLICATION
FEES FOR A LICENSE ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION;
(2) TO ESTABLISH CONDITIONS APPLICABLE TO A LICENSEE;
(3) TO PROVIDE A PATHWAY TO FULL LICENSURE AFTER THE
LICENSEE SUCCESSFULLY SATISFIES ANY LICENSE CONDITIONS ESTABLISHED BY
THE BOARD UNDER ITEM (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(4) NECESSARY FOR THE IMPLEMENTATION, ADMINISTRATION, AND
ENFORCEMENT OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.